tools/nvda/louis/tables/my-g2.ctb
# La				
always လ	123-126
always လာ	123-1
always လာ့	123-126
always လား	123-1-23
always လိ	123-24
always လီ	123-246
always လှ	456-126
always လီး	123-246-23
always လု	123-136-2
always လူ	123-136
always လူ့	123-136-2
always လူး	123-136-23
always လေ	123-156
always လေ့	123-156-2
always လေး	123-156-23
always လဲ	123-2346-23
always လဲ့	123-2346-2
always လံ	123-124
always လံ့	123-124-2
always လို	123-135
always လို့	123-135-2
always လိုး	123-135-23
always လက်	123-15
always လောက်	123-356
always လိုက်	123-346
always လင်	123-35
always လင့်	123-35-2
always လင်း	123-35-23
always လိင်	123-26
always လောင်	123-2356
always လောင့်	123-2356-2
always လောင်း	123-2356-23
always လိုင်	123-235
always လိုင့်	123-235-2
always လိုင်း	123-235-23
always လစ်	123-1346
always လည်	123-2346
always လည့်	123-2346-2
always လည်း	123-23
always လိုဏ်	123-235
always လတ်	123-126-2345
always လိတ်	123-156-13
always လုတ်	123-236
always လန်	123-124
always လန့်	123-124-2
always လန်း	123-124-23
always လိန်	123-26
always လိန့်	123-26-2
always လိန်း	123-26-23
always လပ်	123-126-2345
always လိပ်	123-156-13
always လုပ်	123-236
always လာဘ်	123-126-2345
always လမ်	123-124
always လမ့်	123-124-2
always လမ်း	123-124-23
always လိမ့်	123-26-2
always လိမ်	123-26
always လိမ်း	123-26-23
always လုံ	123-14
always လုံ့	123-14-2
always လုံး	123-14-23
always လယ်	123-2346
always လယ့်	123-2346-2
always လျ	456-13456-126
always လျာ	456-13456-1
always လျား	456-13456-1-23
always လျက်	15
always လျောက်	456-13456-356
always လျင်	456-13456-35
always လျင့်	456-13456-35-2
always လျင်း	456-13456-35-23
always လျောင်	456-13456-2356
always လျောင့်	456-13456-2356-2
always လျောင်း	456-13456-2356-23
always လျစ်	456-13456-1346
always လျဉ်	456-13456-35
always လျဉ့်	456-13456-35-2
always လျဉ်း	456-13456-35-23
always လျပ်	456-13456-126-2345
always လွေ	123-2456-156
always လွေ့	123-2456-156-2
always လွေး	123-2456-156-23
always လွဲ	123-2456-2346-23
always လွဲ့	123-2456-2346-2
always လွင်	123-2456-35
always လွင့်	123-2456-35-2
always လွင်း	123-2456-35-23
always လွတ်	123-136-2345
always လွန်	123-136-1345
always လွန့်	123-136-1345-2
always လွန်း	123-136-1345-23
always လွမ်	123-2456-124
always လွမ့်	123-2456-124-2
always လွမ်း	123-2456-124-23
always လွယ်	123-2456-2346
always လွယ့်	123-2456-2346-2
always လှိ	456-24
always လှီ	456-246
always လှီး	456-246-23
always လှု	456-126
always လှူ	456-136
always လှူ့	456-126
always လှူး	456-136-23
always လှေ	456-156
always လှေ့	456-156-2
always လှေး	456-156-23
always လှဲ	456-2346-23
always လှဲ့	456-2346-2
always လှံ	456-124
always လှံ့	456-124-2
always လှောက်	456-13456-356
always လှိုက်	456-346
always လှင်	456-35
always လှင့်	456-35-2
always လှင်း	456-35-23
always လှောင်	456-2356
always လှောင့်	456-2356-2
always လှောင်း	456-2356-23
always လှိုင်	456-235
always လှိုင့်	456-235-2
always လှိုင်း	456-235-23
always လှစ်	456-1346
always လှည်	456-2346
always လှည့်	456-2346-2
always လှည်း	456-2346-23
always လှန်	456-124
always လှန့်	456-124-2
always လှန်း	456-124-23
always လှပ်	456-126-2345
always လှုပ်	456-236
always လှမ်	456-124
always လှမ့်	456-124-2
always လှမ်း	456-124-23
always လှိမ်	456-26
always လှိမ့်	456-26-2
always လှိမ်း	456-26-23
always လှုံ	456-14
always လှုံ့	456-14-2
always လှုံး	456-14-23
always လျှာ	456-13456-1
always လျှာ့	456-13456-1-2
always လျှား	456-13456-1-23
always လျှံ	456-13456-124
always လျှံ့	456-13456-124-2
always လျှို	456-13456-135
always လျှို့	456-13456-135-2
always လျှိုး	456-13456-135-23
always လျှောက်	456-13456-356
always လျှင်	456
always လျှင့်	456-2
always လျှင်း	456-13456-35-23
always လျှပ်	456-13456-126-2345
always လျှမ်	456-13456-124
always လျှမ့်	456-13456-124-2
always လျှမ်း	456-13456-124-23
always လွှ	456-2456-126
always လွှာ	456-2456-1
always လွှား	456-2456-1-23
always လွှဲ	456-2456-2346-23
always လွှဲ့	456-2456-2346-2
always လွှံ	456-136-1345
always လွှံ့	456-136-1345-2
always လွှင်	456-2456-35
always လွှင့်	456-2456-35-2
always လွှင်း	456-2456-35-23
always လွှတ်	456-136-2345
always လွှမ်	456-2456-124
always လွှမ့်	456-2456-124-2
always လွှမ်း	456-2456-124-23
always လျော	123-13456-12456-23
always လျော့	123-13456-12456-2
always လျော်	123-13456-12456
always လျှော	456-13456-12456
always လျှော့	456-13456-12456-2
always လျှော်	456-13456-12456
always လှော်	456-12456
always လှော့်	456-12456-2
always လှော	456-12456-23
always လော	123-12456-23
always လော့	2346
always လော်	123-12456
always လှယ်	456-2346
always လ်	123-3
always လျှက်	456-13456-15
always လဒ်	123-126-2345
always လဂ်	123-15
always လဇ်	123-15
always လိုဏ်း	123-235-23
always လိုဏ်	123-235
always လိမ်	123-26
always လိမ့်	123-26-2
always လိမ်း	123-26-23
always လျူ	123-13456-136
always လျှဉ်း	456-13456-35-23
always လွ	123-2456-126
always လွာ	123-2456-1
always လွား	123-2456-1-23
always လုံ	123-14
always လုံ့	123-14-2
always လုံး	123-14-23
always လျည်	123-13456-246
always လျော့်	456-13456-12456-2
always လွမ်	123-2456-124
always လွမ့်	123-2456-124-2
always လွမ်း	123-2456-124-23
always လှာ	456-1
always လှား	456-1-23
always လှယ့်	456-2346-2
always လျှ	456-126
always လျိ	456-13456-24
always လျီ	456-13456-246
always လျီး	456-13456-246-23
always လွစ်	123-2456-1346
always လွက်	123-2456-15
always လွပ်	123-136-2345
always လွဏ်	123-136-1345
always လွဏ်း	123-136-1345-23
always လွီ	123-2456-246
always လွိ	123-2456-24
always လွီး	123-2456-246-23
always လှုံး	456-14-23
always လျန်	123-13456-124
always လျန့်	123-13456-124-2
always လျန်း	123-13456-124-23
always လျမ်	123-13456-124
always လျမ့်	123-13456-124-2
always လျမ်း	123-13456-124-23

# LaGyi				
always ဠ	123-126
always ဠာ	123-1
always ဠာ့	123-126
always ဠား	123-1-23
always ဠိ	123-24
always ဠီ	123-246
always ဠီး	123-246-23
always ဠုန်	123-14
always ဠုန့်	123-14-2
always ဠုန်း	123-14-23
always ဠီ့	456-246
always ဠင်	123-35
always ဠင့်	123-35-2
always ဠင်း	123-35-23
always ဠု	123-136-2
always ဠူ	123-136
always ဠူး	123-136-23
always ဠာန်	123-124
always ဠုင်း	123-235-23
always ဠှင်း	123-35-23

# ma				
always မ	134-126
always မာ	134-1
always မာ့	134-126
always မား	134-1-23
always မိ	134-24
always မီ	134-246
always မီး	134-246-23
always မု	134-136-2
always မူ	134-136
always မူ့	134-136-2
always မူး	134-136-23
always မေ	134-156
always မေ့	134-156-2
always မေး	134-156-23
always မဲ	134-2346-23
always မဲ့	134-2346-2
always မံ	134-124
always မံ့	134-124-2
always မို	134-135
always မို့	134-135-2
always မိုး	134-135-23
always မက်	134-15
always မုက်	134-236
always မောက်	134-356
always မိုက်	134-346
always မုခ်	134-236
always မဂ်	134-15
always မင်	134-35
always မင့်	134-35-2
always မင်း	134-35-23
always မောင်	134-2356
always မောင့်	134-2356-2
always မောင်း	134-2356-23
always မိုင်	134-235
always မိုင့်	134-235-2
always မိုင်း	134-235-23
always မစ်	134-1346
always မိစ်	134-156-13
always မဇ်	134-1346
always မဉ်	23456-246
always မည်	134
always မည့်	23456-24
always မည်း	134-2346-23
always မုဋ်	134-236
always မုဒ်	134-236
always မဏ်	134-124
always မတ်	134-126-2345
always မိတ်	134-156-13
always မုတ်	134-236
always မေတ်	134-1346
always မန်	134-124
always မန့်	134-124-2
always မန်း	134-124-23
always မာန်	134-124
always မာန့်	134-124-2
always မာန်း	134-124-23
always မိန်	134-26
always မိန့်	134-26-2
always မိန်း	134-26-23
always မုန်	134-14
always မုန့်	134-14-2
always မုန်း	134-14-23
always မပ်	134-126-2345
always မုံ	56-14
always မုံ့	56-14-2
always မုံး	56-14-23
always မုံ	134-14
always မုံ့	134-14-2
always မုံး	134-14-23
always မယ်	134-2346
always မယ့်	134-2346-2
always မာရ်	134-1
always မလ်	134-2346
always မိလ်	134-26
always မိသ်	134-156-13
always မျ	23456-126
always မျာ	23456-1
always များ	23456
always မျို	23456-135
always မျို့	23456-135-2
always မျိုး	23456-135-23
always မျက်	23456-15
always မျောက်	23456-356
always မျဉ်	23456-35
always မျဉ့်	23456-35-2
always မျဉ်း	23456-35-23
always မြ	23456-126
always မြာ	23456-1
always မြား	23456
always မြီ	23456-246
always မြီ့	23456-24
always မြီး	23456-246-23
always မြူ	23456-136
always မြူ့	23456-136-2
always မြူး	23456-136-23
always မြေ	23456-156
always မြေ့	23456-156-2
always မြေး	23456-156-23
always မြဲ	23456-2346-23
always မြဲ့	23456-2346-2
always မြို	23456-135
always မြို့	23456-135-2
always မြိုး	23456-135-23
always မြက်	23456-15
always မြောက်	23456-356
always မြိုက်	23456-346
always မြင်	23456-35
always မြင့်	23456-35-2
always မြင်း	23456-35-23
always မြောင်	23456-2356
always မြောင့်	23456-2356-2
always မြောင်း	23456-2356-23
always မြိုင်	23456-235
always မြိုင့်	23456-235-2
always မြိုင်း	23456-235-23
always မြစ်	23456-1346
always မြည်	23456-246
always မြည့်	23456-24
always မြည်း	23456-246-23
always မြတ်	23456-126-2345
always မြိတ်	23456-156-13
always မြန်	23456-124
always မြန့်	23456-124-2
always မြန်း	23456-124-23
always မြိန်	23456-26
always မြိန့်	23456-26-2
always မြိန်း	23456-26-23
always မြုပ်	23456-236
always မြုံ	23456-14
always မြုံ့	23456-14-2
always မြုံး	23456-14-23
always မွ	134-2456-126
always မွေ	134-2456-156
always မွေ့	134-2456-156-2
always မွေး	134-2456-156-23
always မွဲ	134-2456-2346-23
always မွဲ့	134-2456-2346-2
always မွတ်	134-136-2345
always မွန်	134-136-1345
always မွန့်	134-136-1345-2
always မွန်း	134-136-1345-23
always မွမ်	134-136-1345
always မွမ့်	134-136-1345-2
always မွမ်း	134-136-1345-23
always မှ	56-126
always မှာ	56-1
always မှား	56-1-23
always မှီ	56-246
always မှု	56-136-2
always မှူ	56-136
always မှူး	56-136-23
always မှေး	156-23
always မှဲ့	56-2346-2
always မှို	56-135
always မှက်	56-15
always မှောက်	56-356
always မှင်	56-35
always မှောင်	56-2356
always မှောင့်	56-2356-2
always မှောင်း	56-2356-23
always မှိုင်	56-235
always မှိုင့်	56-235-2
always မှိုင်း	56-235-23
always မှည့်	56-2346-2
always မှတ်	56-126-2345
always မှိတ်	56-156-13
always မှုတ်	56-236
always မှန်	56-124
always မှန့်	56-124-2
always မှန်း	56-124-23
always မှိန်	56-26
always မှိန့်	56-26-2
always မှိန်း	56-26-23
always မှုန်	56-14
always မှုန့်	56-14-2
always မှုန်း	56-14-23
always မြွေ	134-2456-156
always မြွက်	134-2456-15
always မျှ	125-23456-126
always မျှာ	125-23456-1
always မျှား	125-23456-1-23
always မျှို	125-23456-135
always မျှို့	125-23456-135-2
always မျှို	125-23456-135-23
always မျှင်	125-23456-35
always မျှင့်	125-23456-35-2
always မျှင်း	125-23456-35-23
always မျှစ်	125-23456-1346
always မျှဉ်	125-23456-35
always မျှဉ့်	125-23456-35-2
always မျှဉ်း	125-23456-35-23
always မြု	23456-136-2
always မြှူ	125-23456-136
always မြှူ့	125-23456-136-2
always မြှူး	125-23456-136-23
always မြှေ	125-23456-156
always မြှေ့	125-23456-156-2
always မြှေး	125-23456-156-23
always မြှောက်	125-23456-356
always မြှိုက်	125-23456-346
always မြှင့်	125-23456-35-2
always မြှောင်	125-23456-2356
always မြှောင့်	125-23456-2356-2
always မြှောင်း	125-23456-2356-23
always မြှုပ်	125-23456-236
always မြှပ်	125-23456-126-2345
always မြှုံ	125-23456-14
always မြှုံ့	125-23456-14-2
always မြှုံး	125-23456-14-23
always မွှေ	56-2456-156
always မွှေ့	56-2456-156-2
always မွှေး	56-2456-156-23
always မွှတ်	56-136-2345
always မွှန်	56-136-1345
always မွှန့်	56-136-1345-2
always မွှန်း	56-136-1345-23
always မြွာ	134-2456-1
always မြွင်း	134-2456-35-23
always မြော	23456-12456-23
always မြော့	23456-12456-2
always မြော်	23456-12456
always မျှော	125-23456-12456-23
always မျှော့	125-23456-12456-2
always မျှော်	125-23456-12456
always မျော	23456-12456-23
always မျော်	23456-12456
always မျော့	23456-12456-2
always မှော်	56-12456
always မော	134-12456-23
always မော့	134-12456-2
always မော်	134-12456
always မှိုက်	56-346
always မြှင်	125-23456-35
always မြှင်း	125-23456-35-23
always မွှင်း	56-2456-35-23
always မွှာ	56-2456-1
always မွှား	56-2456-1-23
always မိုရ်	134-135
always မှီး	56-246-23
always မြံ	23456-124
always ​မျှောင်	125-23456-2356

# NaGyi				
always ဏ	1345-126
always ဏာ	1345-1
always ဏီ	1345-246
always ဏု	1345-136-2
always ဏိ	1345-24
always ဏန်း	1345-124-23
always ဏား	1345-1-23
always ဏီး	1345-246-23
always ဏု	1345-136-2
always ဏူး	1345-136-23
always ဏေ	1345-156
always ဏေ့	1345-156-2
always ဏေး	1345-156-23
always ဏှား	6-1-23
always ဏှာ	6-1
always ဏှိ	6-24
always ဏှီ	6-246
always ဏှီး	6-246-23
always ဏံ	1345-124
always ဏံ့	1345-124-2
